Arkansas, session 2025, SB14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-28-215, concerning the filing and
handling of a claim under the Unclaimed Property Act, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(e) The administrator may pay or deliver the property directly to a
person, excluding another state, who does not file a claim under subsection
(a) of this section if:
(1) The person receiving the property is named as the apparent
owner of the property in a report filed under this subchapter;
(2) The administrator reasonably believes the person is entitled
to receive the property; and
(3) The property has a value of less than five thousand dollars
*ZRC007*
12/17/2024 1:11:27 PM ZRC007

SB14
($5,000).



































12/17/2024 1:11:27 PM ZRC007